North Dakota, session 69, HB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 43-41 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Ethics - Caring for individuals questioning sexuality or gender identity .
1. For purposes of this section, "conversion therapy" means any treatment with the goal
of changing the sexual orientation or gender identity of an individual. The term
includes medication, psychotherapy, electroshock therapy, and aversion therapy.
2. It is an ethical violation for a licensee to conduct conversion therapy.
3. It is not an ethical violation for a licensed clinical social worker to counsel an individua l
who is questioning their sexuality or gender and wants to align their sexuality or
gender with the individual's personal or spiritual beliefs.
4. As a condition of engaging in practices or treatment under this section, a licensee:
a. Shall ensure the practice or treatment is in alignment with the individual's self-
determination;
b. Shall disclose to the individual being treated the nature of the treatment or
practices; and
c. Must have received authorization from the individual being treated, or that
individual's parent or guardian, to engage in the practices or treatments.
Page No. 1 25.0915.03000